North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-11 Pensions and Disability Allowances

37-11-01.
Members of militia and national guard and dependents may be given pension.

Every member of the militia or national guard who has been or who shall be wounded or disabled or the surviving dependents of such member in case of the member’s death from such wound or disability while:

In the service of this state in case of riot, tumult, breach of the peace, resistance to process, invasion, disaster relief, the protection of life or property, or insurrection, or imminent danger thereof;

Engaged in any lawfully ordered parade, drill, encampment, or inspection;

Acting pursuant to call in aid of the civil authorities; or

Otherwise ordered to state active duty by the governor,

must be taken care of and provided for at the expense of this state in the manner provided in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1909, ch. 165, § 78; C.L. 1913, § 2423; S.L. 1941, ch. 221, § 73; R.C. 1943, § 37-1101; S.L. 1965, ch. 256, § 3; 1979, ch. 392, § 1.

Collateral References.

What constitutes “salary”, “wages”, “pay”, or the like, within pension law basing benefits thereon, 14 A.L.R.2d 634.

Bonus laws during and after World War II, 22 A.L.R.2d 1134.

37-11-02.
Compensation for disability or death.

Applications for compensation for disability or death of any member of the militia or member of the national guard under conditions as specified in section 37-11-01 must be made by such member or the member’s surviving dependents to workforce safety and insurance. The organization shall process such application in the manner set forth in title 65 and shall make determinations of eligibility and disability in the same manner and upon the same basis as provided in such title. In the event the organization determines a member of the militia or national guard has been disabled under the provisions of section 37-11-01 and title 65 or valid claims of surviving dependents of such member exist in accordance with section 37-11-01 and title 65, it shall pay the claim pursuant to title 65.

Source:

S.L. 1909, ch. 165, §§ 78, 79; C.L. 1913, §§ 2423, 2424; S.L. 1941, ch. 221, §§ 73, 74; R.C. 1943, § 37-1102; S.L. 1965, ch. 256, § 4; 1979, ch. 392, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

37-11-03.
Pension to widow and minor children of member of militia or national guard. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 256, § 6.

37-11-04.
Amount of pensions and claims allowed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 392, § 3.

37-11-05.
Pension examiners and examining boards — Appointment — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 256, § 6.

37-11-06.
Striking pensioners from pension rolls and changing pension awarded. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 392, § 3.

37-11-07.
Disability allowances and care provided. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 392, § 3.

37-11-08.
Claims for disability allowances and care — How considered — Powers of board of inquiry. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 256, § 6.

37-11-09.
Review of findings of board of inquiry on claim for disability allowances — Payment of claim. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 256, § 6.